Tennessee, session 114, SB1583.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-7-109(d), is amended by adding
the following language to the end of the subsection:
Reports submitted on or after January 1, 2027, must include an analysis of the effects of
Exec. Order No. 14370 and any subsequent federal action on increasing medical
marijuana and cannabidiol research.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1583
010768
- 1 -